pt-BR: Acabamento da superfície da pele do bumbo: Transparente; Porosa; Estilo Fiberskyn; Preto liso; Branco liso; Texturizada; Outros
fi: Bassorummun kalvon pinnan viimeistely: Läpinäkyvä; Pinnoitettu; Fiberskyn-tyylinen; Sileä musta; Sileä valkoinen; Kuvioitu; Muu
en: Bass drum head surface finish: Clear; Coated; Fiberskyn-style; Smooth black; Smooth white; Textured; Other
nl: Bassdrumvel oppervlakafwerking: transparant; Gecoat; Fiberskyn-stijl; Glad zwart; Glad wit; Met textuur; Overig
hu: Nagydob bőrének felületkezelése: Clear; Bevonatos; Fiberskyn stílusú; Sima fekete; Sima fehér; Texturált; Egyéb
pt-PT: Acabamento da superfície da pele do bombo: Transparente; Revestido; Estilo Fiberskyn; Preto liso; Branco liso; Texturizado; Outro
th: การตกแต่งพื้นผิวหนังกลองเบส: ใส; เคลือบ; สไตล์ Fiberskyn; ดำเรียบ; ขาวเรียบ; มีพื้นผิว; อื่นๆ
nb: Overflatebehandling av basstrommeskinn: Gjennomsiktig; Belagt; Fiberskyn-stil; Glatt svart; Glatt hvit; Teksturert; Annet
sl-SI: Površinska obdelava glave bas bobna: Prosojno; S premazom; V slogu Fiberskyn; Gladka črna; Gladka bela; Teksturirano; Drugo
sk-SK: Povrchová úprava blany basového bubna: Číra; Potiahnutá; V štýle Fiberskyn; Hladká čierna; Hladká biela; Textúrovaná; Iný
it: finitura superficiale della pelle della grancassa: Trasparente; Sabbiata; Stile Fiberskyn; Nero liscio; Bianco liscio; Ruvida; Altro
ru: Отделка поверхности барабанной головки бас-барабана: Прозрачный; С покрытием; В стиле Fiberskyn; Гладкий черный; Гладкий белый; Текстурированный; Другое
es: Acabado superficial del parche del bombo: Transparente; Revestido; Estilo Fiberskyn; Negro liso; Blanco liso; Texturizado; Otro
ko: 베이스 드럼 헤드 표면 마감: 투명색; 코팅; 파이버스킨 스타일; 스무스 블랙; 스무스 화이트; 질감 처리; 기타
pl: Wykończenie powierzchni membrany stopy perkusyjnej: Przezroczysty; Powlekany; W stylu Fiberskyn; Gładki czarny; Gładki biały; Teksturowany; Inne
ja: バスドラムヘッドの表面仕上げ: クリア; コーテッド; ファイバースキン風; スムースブラック; スムースホワイト; テクスチャード; その他
vi: Hoàn thiện bề mặt mặt trống bass: Trong suốt; Phủ bề mặt; Phong cách Fiberskyn; Đen mịn; Trắng mịn; Có vân; Khác
hr-HR: Završna obrada površine glave bas-bubnja: Prozirno; Premazano; U stilu Fiberskyn; Glatko crno; Glatko bijelo; Teksturirano; Ostalo
sv: Ytbehandling av bastrummans huvud: Genomskinlig; Belagd; Fiberskyn-stil; Slät svart; Slät vit; Strukturerad; Övrigt
tr: Bas davul derisi yüzey kaplaması: Şeffaf; Kaplamalı; Fiberskyn tarzı; Düz siyah; Düz beyaz; Dokulu; Diğer
fr: Finition de surface de la peau de la grosse caisse: Transparent; Sablé; Style Fiberskyn; Noir lisse; Blanc lisse; Texturé; Autre
de: Oberflächenbeschaffenheit des Bassdrumfells: Transparent; Beschichtet; Fiberskyn-Stil; Glatt schwarz; Glatt weiß; Strukturiert; Sonstige
lt-LT: Bosinio būgno membranos paviršiaus apdaila: Skaidrus; Dengtas; „Fiberskyn“ stiliaus; Lygus juodas; Lygus baltas; Tekstūruotas; Kita
cs: Povrchová úprava blány basového bubnu: Průhledné; Potažená; Ve stylu Fiberskyn; Hladká černá; Hladká bílá; S texturou; Jiné
da: Overfladefinish på stortrommeskind: Gennemsigtig; Coatet; Fiberskyn-stil; Glat sort; Glat hvid; Struktureret; Andet
ro-RO: Finisajul suprafeței capului tobei bas: Transparent; Acoperit; Stil Fiberskyn; Negru neted; Alb neted; Texturat; Altele
bg-BG: Повърхностно покритие на кожата на бас барабана: Прозрачен; С покритие; Тип Fiberskyn; Гладко черно; Гладко бяло; Текстуриран; Друго
el: Φινίρισμα επιφάνειας κεφαλής μπάσου τυμπάνου: Διάφανο; Με επίστρωση; Τύπου Fiberskyn; Λείο μαύρο; Λείο λευκό; Ανάγλυφο; Άλλο
zh-CN: 低音鼓鼓皮表面处理: 透明; 涂层; 仿兽皮; 亮黑色; 亮白色; 纹理; 其他
zh-TW: 大鼓鼓皮表面處理: 透明; 塗層處理; 仿牛皮 (Fiberskyn) 風格; 光滑黑; 光滑白; 紋理處理; 其他